Louisiana, session 2026, HB52.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 779(A) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 779. Trial of misdemeanors
A. A defendant charged with a misdemeanor in which the punishment, as set
forth in the statute defining the offense, may be a fine in excess of one two thousand
five hundred dollars or imprisonment for more than six months must be tried by a
jury of six jurors, all of whom must shall concur to render a verdict.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective application and
retroactive application to June 8, 2025.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 52 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.